Arkansas, session 2025, SB148.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative intent.
It is the intent of the General Assembly to:
(1) Provide a voluntary mechanism for early childhood workers to
participate in the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System; and
(2) Require no expenditure of state funds for matching of any
contributions for early childhood workers who are not otherwise eligible for
participation in the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 24-7-202(21), concerning the definition of
"employment with a school" as it applies to the Arkansas Teacher Retirement
System, is amended to add an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(H) Employment of an early childhood worker as defined by
§ 24-7-212(b), with a licensed childcare facility that provides teaching,
early childcare education, or supervision for a child enrolled in a licensed
childcare facility under the Childcare Licensing Act, § 20-78-201 et seq.;"
*LJH108*
03-12-2025 10:10:15 LJH108

As Engrossed: S3/12/25 SB148

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code Title 24, Chapter 7, Subchapter 2, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
24-7-212. Creating an Investment Opportunity for Early Childhood
Workers Act of 2025 — Definition.
(a) This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Creating an
Investment Opportunity for Early Childhood Workers Act of 2025."
(b) As used in this section, "early childhood worker" means a person
who is:
(1) Providing teaching, early childcare education, or
supervision for a child enrolled in a licensed childcare facility under the
Childcare Facility Licensing Act, § 20-78-201 et seq.;
(2) Employed by a childcare provider that is licensed and
regulated by the Department of Education as an appropriate early childhood
program as defined under § 6-45-103; and
(3) Employed by a childcare provider that receives state or
federal child care funding from the Department of Education under § 6-87-101.
(c)(1) A single nonprofit fiscal agent that is approved by the Board
of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System may act as a pass-
through fiscal agent to facilitate the voluntary participation of an early
childhood worker in the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System.
(2) The board shall authorize participation consistent with §
24-7-202(21)(F)(i) and § 24-7-202(21)(F)(ii).
(3) Membership in the system is not mandatory for an employee of
a facility regardless of whether the board authorizes participation under
subdivision (c)(2) of this section.
(d) An early childhood worker shall not be entitled to:
(1) Contribution from state funds; or
(2) Matching from the state or the system.
(e) The board shall promulgate rules for the implementation of this
section.


/s/J. English


03-12-2025 10:10:15 LJH108